GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST2/src/TOOLS/extract_func.xfst
# ============================================================================
# TYPE:		(x)fst script
# CONTENT:      extract lexicon entries for NE recognition
# ENCODING:	UTF-8	[€àáäâ]
#
# LANGUAGE:     SPANISH
#
# AUTHOR:       A.Schiller
#
# CREATED:      04-Aug-2008
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:        xfst -utf8 -s morph.fst -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================


define LEX

# preprocess lexicon
# - ignore prefix "ex-"
# - ignore proper names
# - ignore verbs with clitics
read regex	~[e x %- ?* | $%+Prop | $%+Verb ] .o. LEX ;

set quit-on-fail off

substitute symbol %+Acron for %+Sigla ;
substitute symbol 0 for %+MF ;
substitute symbol 0 for %+SP ;

substitute symbol %- for "\u2012" ;	# [‒]   FIGURE DASH
substitute symbol %- for "\u2013" ;	# [–]   EN DASH
substitute symbol %- for "\u2014" ;	# [—]   EM DASH
substitute symbol %- for "\u2015" ;	# [―]   HORIZONTAL BAR
substitute symbol %- for "\u00AD" ;	# [­]   SOFT HYPHEN
substitute symbol %- for "\u2010" ;	# [‐]   HYPHEN
substitute symbol %- for "\u2011" ;	# [‑]   NON-BREAKING HYPHEN

substitute symbol %' for "\u2018" ;	# [‘]   LEFT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK
substitute symbol %' for "\u2019" ;	# [’]   RIGHT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK
substitute symbol %' for "\u201B" ;	# [‛]   SINGLE HIGH-REVERSED-9 QUOTATION MARK


set quit-on-fail on
define LEX ;

# ----------------------------------------------------------------
# mapping for continuation classes

define TAB    "\t" ;

define FIN    "#;" ;
define CONT0  "XSP;" ;

define CONT   [ "FSG;" | "MSG;" | "FPL;" | "FSG;"
       	      | "FSP;" | "MSP;" | "XSG;" | "XPL;" 
	      ];

define MAP [ 
       CONT0 -> "FSG;"	|| $[%+Fem %+Sg] _
.o.    CONT0 -> "MSG;"	|| $[%+Masc %+Sg] _
.o.    CONT0 -> "FPL;"	|| $[%+Fem %+Pl] _
.o.    CONT0 -> "MPL;"	|| $[%+Masc %+Pl] _
.o.    CONT0 -> "FSP;"	|| $[%+Fem] _
.o.    CONT0 -> "MSP;"	|| $[%+Masc] _
.o.    CONT0 -> "XSG;"	|| $[%+Sg] _
.o.    CONT0 -> "XPL;"	|| $[%+Pl] _
.o.    [%+Fem|%+Masc|%+Sg|%+Pl] -> 0
.o.    "^_" -> " " 
];

# ---------------------------------------------------
echo >>> prepositions (including contracted forms)

define TMP 	$%+Prep .o. LEX ;
define LEX	[LEX - TMP] ;

read regex [MAP.i .o. [ TMP TAB FIN:0 ] ];
write spaced-text | TOOLS/pprint.sh > OLD/func.prep
pop

# ---------------------------------------------------
echo >>> articles

define TMP 	$%+Art .o. LEX ;
define LEX	[LEX - TMP] ;

read regex [MAP.i .o. [ TMP TAB:0 CONT0:0 ] ];
write spaced-text | TOOLS/pprint.sh > OLD/func.art
pop

# ---------------------------------------------------
# echo >>> determiners

define TMP 	$[%+Det|%+PostDet|%+PreDet] .o. LEX ;
define LEX	[LEX - TMP] ;

read regex [MAP.i .o. [ TMP TAB:0 CONT0:0 ] ];
write spaced-text | TOOLS/pprint.sh > OLD/func.det
pop

# ---------------------------------------------------
echo >>> pronouns

define TMP 	$%+Pron .o. LEX ;
define LEX	[LEX - TMP] ;

read regex [MAP.i .o. [ TMP TAB:0 CONT0:0 FIN:0 ] ];
write spaced-text | TOOLS/pprint.sh > OLD/func.pron
pop



# ---------------------------------------------------
echo >>> conjunctions

define TMP	$%+Conj .o. LEX ;
define LEX	[LEX - TMP] ;

read regex [MAP.i .o. [TMP TAB FIN:0 ] ];
write spaced-text | TOOLS/pprint.sh > OLD/func.conj
pop
